Illinois, session 104th, SB3562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Automatic Contract Renewal Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 601/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Automatic renewal offer terms" means the following clear 9and conspicuous disclosures:10        (1) that the paid subscription or purchasing agreement 11    will continue until the consumer cancels;12        (2) the timeframe in which the consumer must cancel in 13    order to avoid being charged for a subsequent term;14        (3) the recurring charges that will be charged to the 15    consumer's credit or debit card or payment account with a 16    third party as part of the automatic renewal contract, and 17    that the amount of the charge may change, if that is the 18    case, and the amount to which the charge will change, if 19    known;20        (4) the length of the automatic renewal term or that 21    the service is continuous, unless the length of the term 22    is chosen by the consumer; and23        (5) the minimum purchase obligation, if any.  SB3562- 2 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1    "Clear and conspicuous" means in larger type than the 2surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to 3the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the 4surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks, in 5a manner that clearly calls attention to the language. In the 6case of an audio disclosure, "clear and conspicuous" means in 7a volume and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and 8understandable. 9    "Contract" means a written agreement between 2 or more 10parties.11    "One-step online cancellation" means an online method of 12cancellation that does not require the consumer to take 13additional actions that obstruct or delay the consumer's 14ability to immediately terminate an automatic renewal contract 15or continuous service offer. 16    "Parties" includes individuals and other legal entities, 17but does not include the federal government, this State or 18another state, or a unit of local government.19(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-70, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (815 ILCS 601/10)21    Sec. 10. Automatic renewal; requirements. 22    (a) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 23corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 24services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where such 25contract automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the   SB3562- 3 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1contract, shall: 2        (i) disclose the automatic renewal offer terms clearly 3    and conspicuously in the contract before the subscription 4    or purchasing agreement is fulfilled and in visual 5    proximity, or in the case of an offer conveyed by voice, in 6    temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the 7    offer;8        (ii) not charge the consumer's credit or debit card or 9    other payment mechanism for an automatic renewal service 10    without first obtaining the consumer's consent to the 11    contract containing the automatic renewal offer terms;12        (iii) provide an acknowledgment that includes the 13    automatic renewal offer terms, cancellation policy, and 14    information regarding how to cancel, which may be 15    accomplished by linking to a resource that provides 16    instructions that account for different platforms and 17    services, in a manner that is capable of being retained by 18    the consumer; and19        (iv) if the offer includes a free gift or trial, 20    disclose how to cancel the contract, which may be 21    accomplished by linking to a resource that provides 22    instructions that account for different platforms and 23    services, and allow the consumer to cancel before the 24    consumer pays for the good or services; and . 25        (v) provide the consumer with the option to cancel the 26    contract, at any time, using a simple cancellation   SB3562- 4 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1    mechanism in the same medium that the consumer used to 2    consent to the contract containing the automatic renewal 3    offer terms. 4    An entity subject to this subsection shall provide a clear 5and conspicuous notice, in a manner that may be retained by the 6consumer, of any material change to the terms of the contract, 7including any price increase, at least 3 days prior to the 8change to the terms. The notice shall contain information 9concerning how to cancel the contract. If the notice is sent 10electronically, the notice shall include either a hyperlink 11that directs the consumer to a webpage containing the 12cancellation process or another reasonably accessible 13electronic method that directs the consumer to the 14cancellation process if no webpage exists.15    (a-5) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 16corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 17services to a consumer pursuant to a contract that includes a 18free trial or a promotional period of the product or service 19that lasts 15 days or longer, where such contract 20automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the contract, 21shall notify the consumer during the free trial or the 22promotional period no less than 3 days before the cancellation 23deadline as described by the automatic renewal offer terms. 24The person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation 25shall send the notice in a method in which the consumer is 26accustomed to interacting with the person, firm, partnership,   SB3562- 5 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1association, or corporation.2    (b) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 3corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 4services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where such 5contract term is a specified term of 12 months or more, and 6where such contract automatically renews for a specified term 7of more than one month unless the consumer cancels the 8contract, shall notify the consumer in writing of the 9automatic renewal. Written notice shall be provided to the 10consumer no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days before 11the cancellation deadline pursuant to the automatic renewal 12offer terms. Such written notice shall disclose clearly and 13conspicuously, in a retainable form:14        (i) that unless the consumer cancels the contract it 15    will automatically renew;16        (ii) a mechanism for cancelling the contract, which 17    shall be offered in a manner in which the consumer 18    commonly interacts with the business; and 19        (iii) the deadline by which the consumer must cancel 20    in order to avoid being charged for a subsequent term. 21    (b-5) Any A person, firm, partnership, association, or 22corporation that makes an automatic renewal offer, or 23continuous service offer, or free trial or promotional period 24offer online shall provide the consumer with the ability to 25cancel or terminate the automatic renewal, continuous service, 26or free trial or promotional period, at any time, using a   SB3562- 6 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1simple, easy-to-use cancellation mechanism, which shall be 2available in:3        (1) the same medium that the consumer used to consent 4    to the offer and resulted in the activation of the 5    automatic renewal contract, continuous service, or free 6    trial or promotional period; or7        (2) the same medium in which the consumer is 8    accustomed to interacting with the business, including, 9    but not limited to, in person or by a toll-free telephone 10    number, electronic mail address, or a postal address if 11    the seller directly bills the consumer, or another 12    cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for 13    cancellation that shall be described in the notice 14    required in subsection (b). 15    (b-10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b-5), 16a A consumer who accepts an automatic renewal, or continuous 17service offer, or free trial or promotional period offer 18online must be allowed to terminate the automatic renewal, or 19continuous service, or free trial or promotional period 20exclusively online, and without engaging in any additional 21steps that obstruct or delay the consumer's ability to cancel 22immediately, which may include a termination email formatted 23and provided by the business that a consumer can send to the 24business without additional information, or a link to a 25website or other online service consumers can use to cancel. 26    (b-15) An entity subject to the provisions of subsection   SB3562- 7 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1(b-5) or (b-10) may comply with those subsections if the 2entity provides:3        (1) a hyperlink to a one-step online cancellation 4    process through a website or other online medium, or 5    through an electronic communication; or6        (2) one of the following means if the consumer 7    consented to the automatic renewal contract offer through 8    means other than online:9            (A) a physical location where the consumer 10        regularly uses any goods or services that are subject 11        to the automatic renewal contract and where the 12        consumer may cancel the contract; or13            (B) a toll-free telephone number.14    Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in this 15subsection, if a consumer requests to cancel the contract, an 16entity may provide a discount offer, retention benefit, or 17other consumer benefit or inform the consumer of the effect of 18the cancellation, provided that the consumer remains able to 19terminate the automatic renewal contract.20    An entity may require a consumer to enter account 21information or digitally authenticate the consumer's identity 22before terminating the contract online if the consumer has an 23account with the business. A consumer who is unwilling or 24unable to enter account information or digitally authenticate 25the consumer's identity before termination of the contract 26online shall not be prevented from terminating the contract   SB3562- 8 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1offline using another method. 2    (b-20) It is a violation of this Act for any person, firm, 3partnership, association, or corporation that sells or offers 4to sell any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a 5contract, where such contract automatically renews unless the 6consumer terminates the contract, to charge the consumer or 7the consumer's account following an increase in price, or a 8price higher than what was disclosed in the contract's 9automatic renewal offer terms, without either:10        (1) obtaining the consumer's consent to the increased 11    price before the increase in price occurs; or12        (2) allowing the consumer to cancel the contract 13    anytime within at least 7 days after the charge is 14    assessed to the consumer or the consumer's account and 15    refunding the consumer in the amount equivalent to the 16    price of the remaining term of the service, at the time of 17    the cancellation, on a pro rata basis.18    (c) A person, firm, partnership, association, or 19corporation will not be liable for a violation of this Act or 20the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act if 21such person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation 22demonstrates that, as part of its routine business practice:23        (i) it has established and implemented written 24    procedures to comply with this Act and enforces compliance 25    with the procedures;26        (ii) any failure to comply with this Act is the result   SB3562- 9 -LRB104 20056 SPS 33507 b1    of error; and2        (iii) where an error has caused a failure to comply 3    with this Act, it provides a full refund or credit for all 4    amounts billed to or paid by the consumer from the date of 5    the renewal until the date of the termination of the 6    account, or the date of the subsequent notice of renewal, 7    whichever occurs first. 8(Source: P.A. 102-517, eff. 1-1-22; 103-70, eff. 1-1-24; 9103-919, eff. 1-1-25.)